Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1654
Tuition Recovery Cash Fund; established; use; investment.

The Tuition Recovery Cash Fund is hereby established. The fund shall be a cash fund used to receive assessments imposed under section 85-1656 and to pay claims authorized under section 85-1657. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund or the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Tuition Recovery Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest earned by the fund shall accrue to the fund.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 52;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 92;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2859;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 54;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 208;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 226.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.